District of Columbia statutes.
38-621

Assignment to schools; hours; level of services; nurse or athletic trainer at sponsored athletic events; funding.

(a)

A registered nurse shall be assigned to each District of Columbia (“District”) elementary and secondary public and public charter school a minimum of 12 hours per week during each semester and during summer school if a summer school program is operated.

(b)

(1)

The minimum hours per week of registered nurse services at each school shall increase from 12 to 16 hours per week beginning 1 year after December 10, 1987. The minimum hours per week of registered nurse services at each school shall increase from 16 to 20 hours per week beginning 2 years after December 10, 1987.

(2)

Licensed practical nurses may be used to supplement the registered nurse work force in meeting the required 20 hours per week minimum registered nurse services at each elementary and middle school. The licensed practical nurses shall perform their duties under the appropriate supervision and in general collaboration with the registered nurses.

(c)

Any school that, on May 1, 1987, exceeded the standards for registered nurse services prescribed by subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall continue that level of service, or the level prescribed by subsection (a) or (b) of this section, whichever is greater. No reduction shall be made in the level of registered nurse services at any school except in response to a reduced need based on a reduced student enrollment or a reduced proportion of students requiring special services because of handicapping conditions.

(d)

Appropriate medical coverage, as defined in rules issued by the Board of Education in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, and in consultation with the Director, Department of Health, shall be provided by the Board of Education at any interscholastic athletic event if the event is sponsored by a District public school, occurs in the District, and is identified as requiring medical coverage by rule. This medical coverage may include, but is not limited to:

(1)

A licensed medical doctor;

(2)

A registered nurse;

(3)

A certified athletic trainer;

(4)

An emergency medical technician (“EMT”) or paramedic;

(5)

A certified prehospital care provider (as determined by the Director, Department of Health); or

(6)

An adult trained by the Red Cross with current certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (“CPR”), first aid, or life-saving.

(e)

(1)

Appropriate medical coverage shall be consistent with the risk of injury involved in the interscholastic athletic event. The medical personnel that shall be present at an interscholastic athletic event that occurs in the District and that is sponsored by a District secondary public school shall be detailed as follows:

(A)

For varsity football, a licensed medical doctor and for non-varsity football, a licensed medical doctor or certified athletic trainer;

(B)

For basketball, wrestling, soccer, indoor or outdoor track and field events, or cross-country, at least 1 licensed doctor, certified athletic trainer, registered nurse, EMT or paramedic, or any other certified prehospital care provider, as determined by the Director, Department of Health;

(C)

For volleyball, baseball, softball, or swimming, at least 1 licensed medical doctor, certified athletic trainer, registered nurse, EMT or paramedic, any other certified prehospital care provider, as determined by the Director, Department of Health, or adult trained by the American Red Cross with current certification in CPR, first aid, or life-saving;

(D)

For tennis or golf, medical personnel coverage shall be optional as financial resources allow; and

(E)

For any other sport, the appropriate level of medical personnel coverage, commensurate with the risk of injury involved, shall be set by the Superintendent of Schools of the District of Columbia, in consultation with the Director, Department of Health, and approved by the Board of Education; and

(2)

The medical personnel coverage services shall be in addition to the minimum hours of registered nurse services required by subsection (a) or (b) of this section.

(f)

Sufficient funds to carry out the requirements of this section shall be appropriated out of the general revenues of the District.

(g)

Beginning with the fiscal year 1991, the responsibility for implementation of this act shall be transferred from the Department of Human Services to the Board of Education.

Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-45, § 2, 34 DCR 6845
July 25, 1990, D.C. Law 8-149, § 2, 37 DCR 3717
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-29, § 2, 38 DCR 4213
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 401, 44 DCR 7378
Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-224, § 2, 46 DCR 483
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 602, 52 DCR 2331
“This act” referred to in (g) is D.C. Law 8-149.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 602 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 602 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-630, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1143).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 602 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-407, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3659).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 602 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-279, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 60).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 602 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-71, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3593).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 602 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-3, January 22, 2003, 50 DCR 1426).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 602 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-310, March 26, 2002, 49 DCR 3420).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Public School Nurse Assignment Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-448, September 18, 1998, 45 DCR 6665), and § 2 of the Public School Nurse Assignment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-555, December 30, 1998, 45 DCR 570).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 401 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and § 401 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
Section 901(b) of D.C. Law 15-319 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 602 of D.C. Law 15-319, in subsec. (a), substituted “public and public charter” for “public.”
Section 1101(b) of D.C. Law 15-117 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 602 of D.C. Law 15-117, in subsec. (a), inserted “and public charter” after “public”.
Section 1101 (b) of D.C. Law 15-2 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 602 of D.C. Law 15-2 amended subsec. (a) by inserting “and public charter” after “public”.
Section 1101(b) of D.C. Law 14-164 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 602 of D.C. Law 14-164, in subsec. (a), inserted “and public charter” following “public”.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 12-182 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 12-182 in (e)(1)(A), inserted “varsity,” and added “and for non-varsity football, a licensed medical doctor or certified athletic trainer.”
Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
D.C. Law 12-59 substituted “Director, Department of Health” for “Commissioner of Public Health” in the introductory language of (d) and in (d)(5), (e)(1)(B), (e)(1)(C), and (e)(1)(E).
D.C. Law 15-353, in subsec. (a), inserted “and public charter” following “public”.
1981 Ed., § 31-2421.